Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.270

Export market development project records—Confidentiality.

Except for release of statistical information not descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons, all financial and commercial information and records supplied by persons to the department with respect to export market development projects shall be kept confidential unless confidentiality is waived by the party supplying the information. For purposes of this section, persons include any natural person, joint venture, firm, partnership or association, private or public corporation, or governmental entity.

[ 1996 c 80 s 2.]